Maryland, session 2026, SB0322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
8–103.
(a) Notwithstanding § 8–102 of this subtitle, an individual qualifies for jury
service for a county only if the individual:
(1) Is an adult as of the day selected as a prospective juror;
(2) Is a citizen of the United States; and
(3) Resides in the county as of the day sworn as a juror.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and subject to the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act, an individual is not qualified for jury service if the
individual:
(1) Cannot comprehend spoken English or speak English;
(2) Cannot comprehend written English, read English, or write English
proficiently enough to complete a juror qualification form satisfactorily;
(3) Has a disability that, as documented by a health care provider’s
certification, prevents the individual from providing satisfactory jury service;
(4) Has been convicted, in a federal or State court of record, of [a]:
– 1 –

Ch. 875 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) A crime punishable by imprisonment exceeding 1 year and
[received a sentence of imprisonment for more than 1 year] IS CURRENTLY SERVING THE
SENTENCE IMPOSED FOR THE CONVICTION, INCLUDING A TERM OF PAROLE OR
PROBATION; or
(II) A CRIME INVOLVING OR RELATING TO:
1. PERJURY;
2. WITNESS INTIMIDATION;
3. JURY INTIMIDATION; OR
4. A CRIME UNDER TITLE 8 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE; OR
(5) Has a charge pending, in a federal or State court of record, for a crime
punishable by imprisonment exceeding 1 year.
[(c) An individual qualifies for jury service notwithstanding a disqualifying
conviction under subsection (b)(4) of this section if the individual is pardoned.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Enacted under Article II, § 17(c) of the Maryland Constitution, May 31, 2026.
– 2 –